Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2234
Nursing program; survey; report; approval.

A survey of the program institution shall be made by the executive director or other representative appointed by the board, who shall submit a written report of the survey to the board. If, in the opinion of the board, the program meets the requirements for approval, the board shall approve the program.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 15(3), p. 843;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 26;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.26;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 790.